Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.215

Embalmers—Authorization to embalm—Information required—Immediate care of body—Waiver—Penalty.

(1)(a) No licensed embalmer shall embalm human remains without first having obtained authorization from the individual or individuals that have the right to control the disposition under RCW 68.50.160.

(b) The funeral director or embalmer shall inform the family member or representative of the deceased that embalming is not required by state law, except that embalming is required under certain conditions as determined by rule by the state board of health.

(2)(a) Any licensee authorized to dispose of human remains shall refrigerate or embalm the human remains upon receipt of the human remains. However, subsection (1) of this section and RCW 68.50.108 shall be complied with before human remains are embalmed. Upon written authorization of the proper state or local authority, the provisions of this subsection may be waived for a specified period of time.

(b) Violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2005 c 365 s 17; 2003 c 53 s 127; 1987 c 331 s 76; 1985 c 402 s 5; 1981 c 43 s 15.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Effective date—1987 c 331: See RCW 68.05.900.

Legislative finding—1985 c 402: See note following RCW 68.50.185.